Illinois, session 104th, SB2980.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Climate Displacement Task Force Act is 5amended by changing Section 15 as follows: 6    (20 ILCS 4138/15)7    (Section scheduled to be repealed on December 31, 2028)8    Sec. 15. Duties. The Climate Displacement Task Force is 9created to make findings and recommendations regarding climate 10displacement within this State and to submit 2 reports. The 11first report shall analyze scientific research and global 12modeling to accurately assess the level of climate 13displacement that is projected to happen within the United 14States and its neighboring countries. The first report shall 15also delineate the Task Force's findings, conclusions, and 16recommendations and shall be submitted to the General Assembly 17no later than December 31 June 30, 2026.18    The second report shall be developed with the information 19gathered in the first report and shall provide a needs 20assessment of infrastructure, systems development, and 21collaboration plans between State agencies to ensure that the 22State is prepared through 2050 for these upcoming challenges. 23The second report shall also delineate the Task Force's   SB2980 Enrolled- 2 -LRB104 19391 SPS 32839 b1findings, conclusions, and recommendations and shall be 2submitted to the General Assembly no later than December 31 3June 30, 2027. In this Section, "systems development" includes 4building resilient and adaptable systems across various 5sectors, including governance, infrastructure, and social 6services, to proactively address the challenges and impacts of 7climate change-induced displacement.8    Once the initial voting members have been appointed, the 9Task Force shall meet not less than once each month following 10the effective date of this Act to carry out the duties 11prescribed in this Act.12(Source: P.A. 104-396, eff. 8-15-25.) 13    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 14becoming law.